Last Updated: [July 7
th
, 2022]
Crazy Maple Studio Inc. and its affiliates (“Crazy Maple Studio”, “us”,
      “our” or “we”) are dedicated to protecting the privacy rights of our
      users (“users” or “you”). This Privacy Policy (the “Policy”) describes
      the ways we collect, store, use, and manage the information, including
      personal information, that you provide or that we collect in connection
      with our websites that link to the Policy (such as,
http://www.crazymaplestudios.com
) or any Crazy Maple Studio mobile
      application or game (available for
      example on iOS and Android) (collectively, the “Services”) and the
      privacy rights available to you.
Please note this Policy only applies to information collected or
      received by Crazy Maple Studio through your use of the Services. It does
      not apply to, and Crazy Maple Studio is not responsible for, the actions
      of third party people or companies, the content of their sites, their
      use of information you provide to them, or any products or services they
      may offer. Any link to those sites does not constitute our sponsorship
      of, endorsement of, or affiliation with, those people or companies.
By using the Services, you confirm you have read and understand this
      Policy and the processing of your personal information, in the manner
      provided in this Policy.
If you have any questions about this Policy or do not see your concerns
      addressed here, please contact us by email at
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
.
Information We Collect From or About You
Crazy Maple Studio collects information about you as described below. As
      set out below in more detail, we use and in specific cases combine that
      information to operate, tailor content, personalize and adjust and
      improve our Services, and to send you messages or personalized
      information about our games, your scores, new features and more,
      including for marketing and promotional purposes in accordance with your
      preferences.
Information You Give Us:
When you register for
      and/or use our Services (for example, when you create an account to
      access our Services, populate your in-app profile, communicate with
      other users of our Services (e.g. through in-game chat or forum posts),
      contact our customer service or participate in any sweepstakes, contests
      or promotion), we collect and store any information that you give us.
      This information may also include information you provide through
      single-sign-on processes (such as through Facebook), including account
      name or account number (e.g. your userID), email address or other
      identifiers needed to link your online account with our Services.
Creation of a Crazy Maple Studio account.
We will collect certain
      information from you during the registration/ sign-up process for the
      Services. This may include information like your name, locale, phone
      number, or email address.
Your content.
Our Services may allow you to create, upload or
      share content such as text, images, audio, your profile information
      (such as your avatar name and appearance) or other content you create
      when you play our games or otherwise use our Services,
Facebook Connect, Game Center, and Google+:
You may be able to
      log in to our Services using sign-in services (“Social Login”) such as
      Facebook Connect, Apple’s Game Center, or an Open ID provider. These
      third party Social Login platforms will authenticate your identity and
      provide you the option to share certain personal information with us
      such as your name or email address to pre-populate our sign up form.
      Social Login platforms like Facebook Connect give you the option to post
      information about your activities on our Services to your profile page
      on such Social Login platform to share with others within your network.
We may collect and record information through the relevant Social Login
      platform in accordance with the policies and terms of that Social Login
      platform. The information we collect when you connect your user account
      to a Social Login platform may include: (1) your name, (2) your Social
      Login's user identification number and/or user name, (3) locale, city,
      state and country, (4) sex, (5) birth date, (6) email address, (7)
      profile picture or its URL, and (8) the Social Login's user
      identification numbers for your friends that are also connected to Crazy
      Maple Studio game(s).
Invite a Friend:
Crazy Maple Studio may offer you the opportunity
      to invite your contacts from a Social Login platform (such as your
      Facebook friends) so that those contacts can be located in Crazy Maple
      Studio games and/or you can invite them to join you in our games. Such
      contact information will be used only for the purpose of sending the
      invitation to the addressee(s).
Interaction with Customer Service:
We may collect your email
      address and any other personal information you provide to us when you
      contact our customer service or otherwise communicate with us.
Forums, Sweepstakes, Contests and Surveys:
We may also acquire
      information from you through (1) your access and participation in forums
      or in game chats on the Services, or (2) your participation in surveys
      regarding the Services. We may also provide you the opportunity to
      participate in a sweepstakes or contest through our Service. If you
      participate, we will request certain personal information from you.
      Participation in these sweepstakes and contests are voluntary and you
      therefore have a choice whether or not to disclose this information. The
      requested information typically includes your contact information (such
      as name and shipping address), and demographic information (such as zip
      code or equivalent). We use this information to administer the
      sweepstakes or contest and to notify winners and award prizes. We may
      use a third party service provider to conduct these sweepstakes or
      contests; in such case, that company is prohibited from using your
      personal information for any other purpose.
Information Collected Automatically
: When you
      interact with or use our Services, we automatically collect certain
      information about your device and your use of our Services. This could
      include information such as your, browser type and language, IP address,
      device ID, hardware and software information, advertising ID, gameplay
      data, standard sever log information, your connections and interactions
      with other users, purchase histories with us and social media data (if
      you have linked your account and in accordance with your sharing
      permissions). We (or the third parties we work with) use standard
      tracking technologies (like log files, software development kits (SDKs)
      and web beacons) to do this. In addition, we or our partners may also
      use tracking technologies and advertising IDs to serve personalized ads
      to you in our Services. Please see the section below relating to
      Tracking Technologies [INSERT LINK TO COOKIES AND SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES
      SECTION] for more details.
Mobile Platforms:
When you play or otherwise use any of our
      mobile games or applications, we or third party partners will collect
      and process certain information about you, including your unique device
      ID (persistent / non-persistent), hardware type, device maker, media
      access control (“MAC”) address, international mobile equipment identity
      (“IMEI”), the type and version of your operating system (“OS”), language
      of the OS, your unique device ID, your time zone, the screen size of
      your device, mobile device Advertising ID (known as “IDFA” for iOS
      devices, or “Android Advertising ID” for Android devices), your general
      geolocation information (city/country based on your Internet Protocol
      (“IP”) address) and your email address (if you have connected to
      Facebook or Google+). This information is useful to us for
      troubleshooting and helps us understand usage trends so that we can
      improve and personalize the Services for our users. Device identifier /
      information such as device type, hardware model, device maker, device
      operating system and its language or other technical data like screen
      size, or combination of this data, is also collected and used to
      determine device compatibility and optimal settings. We may also share
      this information with our advertising partners to enable the technical
      delivery of personalized ads to your device, as further described below
      [LINK TO INTEREST BASED ADVERTISING SECTION].
User ID:
When you register to use the Services, we create a
      unique user ID to track your use of our Services. Specifically, this
      unique user ID is stored in connection with your profile information to
      track the Crazy Maple Studio games you are playing.
Game Data Collection:
We collect gameplay information about how
      you use and play our games. For example, we automatically collect data
      such as your game session time, your in-game interactions (including
      with other players, where applicable), in-app purchases that you may
      make, resource events such as the acquisition or spend of in-game
      virtual currencies by you, progression events that are used to mark your
      progress or movement within the game (e.g. achievements) and install
      timestamps. This information may be associated with your user ID, IP
      address or device ID for the purpose of providing you our Services and
      improving and personalizing them, or to make inferences regarding your
      preferences, predispositions, behavior, abilities and aptitudes. With
      your consent, we will also collect your exact or precise location so
      that we are able to match you with other players in your area.
Mobile Analytics:
Like most mobile applications, we use mobile
      analytics tools to collect certain information about your usage of our
      mobile applications and games, as well as on your device and the health
      of our Services to allow us to better understand the functionality of
      our Services on your device and for app optimization purposes. Such
      tools may record information such as how often you use the application
      or game, feature usage, gameplay and usage statistics, events that occur
      within the application or game, aggregated usage and performance data,
      and where the application or game was downloaded from (i.e. which
      application store).
We do not link the information we store within the analytics software to
      any information that personally identifies you within the mobile
      application.
Our Use of Tracking Technologies to Collect Information Automatically
A. Tracking Technologies
We and our third party partners, affiliates, or analytics service
      providers use standard tracking technologies (like web beacons, SDKs,
      APIs, scripts and tags) to identify your computer/device, to “remember”
      things about your visit or your use of the Services (such as your
      preferences or a user name) and to help us understand things like, what
      pages and features you use and the games you play.
Such information may be linked to or combined with other personal
      information we process about you, such as your user ID, for purposes
      such as improving the quality of our Services, tailoring recommendations
      to your interests, providing and personalizing our Services including
      making our Services easier to use, and for fraud prevention, security
      and authentication purposes.
Please refer to guidance provided by your device manufacturer, operating
      system developer, or individual web browser if you would like help in
      managing your preferences with respect to tracking technologies used on
      our Services.
B. Interest-Based Advertising
Some of our Services employ ad-serving technologies that use cookies,
      clear GIFs, web beacons, tracking pixels, and other similar technologies
      to deliver interest-based advertising to you about third party products
      and services. We may via our third party advertising partners, also
      advertise our Services to you on third parties’ websites. You may also
      see our games advertised in other services (like on Facebook). After
      clicking on one of these advertisements and installing our game, you
      will become a user of our Services.
When you play our games or otherwise use our apps, some third party
      tools (SDKs) integrated within our Services may collect and use certain
      information collected from your device for the purpose of ad display and
      optimization. Such information includes GAID (Google Advertising ID on
      Android devices) or IDFA (Identifier for Advertising on iOS devices),
      region (i.e. the location where a given language is used), geo-location
      information (with your consent) and IP address. This Policy does not
      govern our third-party advertising partners, as they have their own
      privacy policies, which are accessible using the links provided below.
      We have no access to or control over such third parties. In addition to
      identifiers, these third parties may also collect information relating
      to:
Advertisements served and the location of the ad;
Length of time an advertisement was visible;
Domain type, IP address, size of the advertisement; and
Click-throughs (i.e. whether a click was made on the ad) and advertisement response.
They use this information (alone or in combination with information they have collected about you when you use
      third party websites or services) to: (i) enable the technical delivery of ads to your device and to verify
      click-throughs and/or installs; (ii) provide you with more relevant ads about our Services (for example, to
      present you with an offer for one of our games you might enjoy); (iii) enable offer walls, which allow you to
      choose from various rewarded ad or market research offers; (iv) track results and measure the effectiveness of
      ads; and (iv) improve the accuracy of their targeting and measurement systems. We recommend that you review our
      advertising partners' privacy policies for more information, further details of which are set out below:
Tapjoy:
https://www.tapjoy.com/legal/publishers/privacy-policy/
Tenjin:
https://www.tenjin.io/privacy/
Vungle:
http://vungle.com/privacy/
Unityads:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Adcolony:
https://www.adcolony.com/privacy-policy/
Mopub:
https://www.mopub.com/legal/privacy/
Gameanalytics:
https://gameanalytics.com/privacy
You can learn more about ad serving companies and the options available to limit their collection
      and use of your information by visiting the websites for the
Network Advertising Initiative
and
      the
Digital Advertising Alliance
,
      and the webpages for
Facebook's ad preferences tool
and
privacy policy
. Similarly, you can learn
      about your options to opt-out of mobile app tracking by certain advertising networks through your device settings
      and by resetting the advertiser ID on your Apple or Android device. For more information about how to change these
      settings go to:
Apple:
http://support.apple.com/kb/HT4228
Android:
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/2662922
Windows:
http://choice.microsoft.com/en-US/opt-out
Please note: adjusting your preferences as described in this section does not mean you will no longer receive
      advertisements, it only means the ads you do see will be less relevant to your interests. Our advertising partners
      will also still use your device’s advertising ID to serve you with ads that may be less relevant to you; for
      example, we may use this for frequency capping (in other words, to control the maximum number of times you see the
      same ad from us). You may also reset the Advertising ID associated with your device by following instructions
      provided by your device manufacturer or operating system developer.
C. Analytics Technologies
We use our own game servers and third party analytic technologies to collect information about how you use our
      Services, your computer or device and the health of our Services.
For instance, we use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. (1600 Amphitheatre
      Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA), on our Services. Google Analytics uses cookies or other tracking
      technologies to help us analyze how users interact with and use the Services, compile reports on the Services’
      activity
      , and provide other services related to our Services’ activity and usage. The technologies used by Google may
      collect information such as your IP address, time of visit and whether you are a return visitor. The Services do
      not use Google Analytics to gather information that personally identifies you. The information generated by Google
      Analytics will be transmitted to and stored by Google and will be subject to Google’s privacy policies. To learn
      more about Google’s
partner services
and to learn
      how to opt out of tracking of analytics by Google,
      click
here
.
For our mobile apps and games on iOS and Android, we use the services of Adjust GmbH (Saarbrücker Str. 37a, 10405
      Berlin, Germany). We use the Adjust SDK (Software Development Kit) which is an analytics service that provides us
      the ability to obtain and collect statistical data on the usage of our games and apps so that we can better
      understand how our users are using our games and apps. For this purpose, Adjust processes mobile identifiers such
      as the IDFA, GAID or similar mobile identifiers. Adjust's privacy policy is available
here
.
Your browser or device may include “Do Not Track” functionality. Because there is not yet a common understanding
      of how to interpret Do Not Track signals, we do not currently respond to "Do Not Track" signals. However, we
      provide you with the ability to opt-out of the use of tracking technologies to send you interest-based advertising
      as explained above.
How We Use Information
We use information collected through our Services, both individually and combined together, for purposes
      described in this Policy or disclosed to you in connection with our Services. For example, we may use your
      information to:
Create user accounts and allow users to play our games and use our mobile applications;
Identify and suggest connections with other users of our Services;
Facilitate sharing on social networks;
Operate, develop and improve our mobile applications, games and other Services;
Understand you and your preferences to enhance and personalize your experiences and enjoyment using our
        Service;
Provide you with personalized recommendations for mobile applications and games and/or Services;
Respond to your comments and questions and provide customer service;
Provide and deliver products and services you request;
Measure the health of our Services;
Set up and maintain accounts you register for;
Identify, fix and troubleshoot bugs and Service or functionality errors;
Activate or authenticate your mobile applications and games and save in-game progress and stats (e.g.
        achievements);
Run competitions and contests;
Survey your opinions through surveys or questionnaires;
Serve and measure the effectiveness of advertising;
Send you service-related information, including confirmations, invoices, technical notices, updates, security
        alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Personalizing advertising for you;
Communicating with you via email about promotions, rewards, upcoming events, and other news about products and
        services offered by Crazy Maple Studio and our selected partners, in accordance with your marketing preferences.
        If you no longer wish to receive marketing or promotional communications from us, you may opt-out at any time by
        emailing us at
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
or by
        using the unsubscribe options in the email;
Enable you to communicate with other users;
Personalize content and experiences on our Services, including providing you reports, recommendations and
        feedback based on your preferences;
Optimize or improve our products, services and operations;
Facilitate software updates and automatically update the software on your device;
Protect the integrity of the Services and enforce our Terms of Service and other applicable terms, including
        to detect and prevent fraud and unauthorized activities, to secure our systems and the Services, to prevent
        hacking, cheats and spamming and generally to keep our Services safe and fair and to detect, investigate, and
        prevent activities that may violate our policies or be illegal;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, and prosecute
        those responsible for that activity;
Perform statistical, demographic, and marketing analyses of users of the Services.
We may use information we collect from or about you to create aggregated or de-identified data that does not
      specifically identify you.
Push Notifications:
With your consent in accordance with your device settings, we may send you push
      notifications through our mobile applications to send you game or app updates, high scores and other service
      related notifications that may be of importance to you. You may at any time opt-out from receiving these types of
      communications by turning them off at the device level through your settings.
How We Disclose Your Information
Crazy Maple Studio does not share your personal information except as approved by you or as otherwise described
      in this Policy. We may disclose your information in the following circumstances.
With your consent:
We may share your personal information with certain third parties
        with your approval and
        consent.
Service Providers:
We engage other companies and individuals to perform services on
        our behalf for the
        purposes described in this Policy. Examples of these services include analyzing data, IT and related services,
        payment processing, sending emails and providing customer support, and security fraud-detection services. These
        agents and service providers may have access to your personal information in connection with the performance of
        services for Crazy Maple Studio and are contractually obligated to maintain the confidentiality and security of
        your personal information. We also require that they only use the data on our behalf and for purposes consistent
        with this Policy.
Third Party Plug-ins:
With third party applications and platforms, such as Facebook
        Connect, that give you the
        option to post information about your activities on our websites and games to your profile page to share with
        others within your network. This Policy does not apply to your use of any such third party applications and
        services, and we are not responsible for how those third parties collect, use and disclose your information. We
        encourage you to review the privacy policies of those third parties before connecting to or using their
        applications or services to learn more about their information and privacy practices.
Other Users:
When you participate in multiplayer games, your in-game profile,
        avatar, game play and statistics
        will be visible to all. Also, if you participate in social features, such as chat, the audio, visual, and
        electronic information that you disclose may become publically available. It may also be read, copied,
        collected, or used by other players. Please make sure your privacy settings reflect your preferences.
Disclosures to protect us or others:
We may release your information as required by
        law, such as to comply
        with a subpoena, or when we believe that release is appropriate to comply with the law; investigate fraud,
        respond to a government request, enforce or apply our rights; or protect the rights, property, and safety of us
        or our users, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud
        protection.
Disclosures in the event of merger, sale or asset transfer:
We may share your
        information in connection with
        any merger, sale of our assets, or a financing or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another
        company. You will be notified via email and/or a notice on our Services of any change in ownership or use of
        your personal information.
Affiliates:
We may share personal information with our affiliated companies.
Advertising Partners:
Through our Services, we may allow third-party advertising
        partners to set technologies
        and other tracking tools to collect information regarding your use of the Services and your devices as further
        described in the Interest Based Advertising section above.
Other Important Information
Changes to the Policy
We may update this Policy from time to time to reflect changes to our information practices. If we make any
      material changes we will notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of
      a notice on the Services prior to the change becoming effective. If we are required by applicable data protection
      laws to give you enhanced notice or seek your consent to any such changes, we will do so. You can see when this
      policy was last updated by checking the "last updated" date displayed at the top of this Policy. We encourage you
      to periodically review this page for the latest information on our privacy practices.
Security
Crazy Maple Studio takes reasonable and appropriate measures to protect your information from unauthorized access
      or against loss, misuse or alteration by third parties.
Although we make good faith efforts to store the information collected on the Service in a secure operating
      environment that is not available to the public, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of that information
      during its transmission or its storage on our systems. Further, while we attempt to ensure the integrity and
      security of our network and systems, we cannot guarantee that our security measures will prevent third parties
      from illegally obtaining access to this information. We do not warrant or represent that your information will be
      protected against, loss, misuse, or alteration by third parties. No method of transmission over the Internet, or
      method of electronic storage, is 100% secure, however. Therefore, we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Data Retention
We will retain your information for as long as your account is active or as needed to provide you with our
      Services. If you wish to cancel your account or request that we no longer use your information to provide you
      services, contact us at reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we will retain and
      use
      your information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolved disputes, and enforce our agreements.
Our Policy Regarding Children
We do not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from a child under the age of 13 (or the age of
      majority in your jurisdiction of residence), nor do we knowingly allow children to use our Service. If you are a
      child under 13 (or the age of majority in your jurisdiction of residence), please do not send any information
      about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under the age of 13
      may provide any personal information. If you believe that we have collected personal information from a child,
      please contact us using the contact details as set forth below. In the event that we learn that we have collected
      personal information from a child, we will delete that information as soon as commercially practicable.
International Transfers
We may transfer information that we collect about you to affiliated entities, or other third parties across
      borders and from your country or jurisdiction to other countries or jurisdictions around the world. Please note
      that these countries and jurisdictions may not have the same data protection laws as your own jurisdiction, and we
      take steps to ensure adequate safeguards are in place to enable transfer of information to the U.S. and elsewhere
      and the use and disclosure of information about you, including personal information, as described in this Policy.
User Behaviour Policy
Our services may allow you to create, upload or share content such as text, images, and audio. There is no
      tolerance for objectionable content or abusive users. If the content you create contains objectionable content or
      abusive users behaviour, we have the right to delete or remove it.
Your Privacy Choices
Your Choices About Information Provided by You
If you do not want to provide Crazy Maple Studios with personal information, then you can choose not to provide
      it. If you choose not to provide us with personal information, we may not always be able to provide you with the
      Services you want. For example, without providing an email address, you cannot create an account with us to access
      and play our games.
Your Choices About Information Provided by Third Parties
You may be able to control how third parties collect and share your Information by changing your preferences or
      opting out of collection directly with those third parties. Before disclosing Information to third parties, we
      recommend you check their respective privacy policies for further details.
Your Marketing and Advertising Choices
You can exercise choices over how we use your personal information and update your preferences at any time:
To remove yourself from individual contests or promotions, or to opt-out from receiving marketing
        communications from us, simply click the unsubscribe link in the email or emailing us at
        reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com. If you opt-out of receiving email marketing communications from us,
        please
        note we may still contact you occasionally about the status of your account, such as to inform you that your
        account may be expiring, or for other service related information.
To disable selected tracking technologies from collecting information relating to the effectiveness of
        advertising campaigns or analytics data and from serving you with personalized advertising on our Services,
        please see the Tracking Technologies section above.
Accessing and Deleting Your Information
You may deactivate your Crazy Maple Studio account or delete email associate with your account by contacting us
      at
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
.
If you would like to access or view the personal information we hold about you or for any reason you are
      concerned with the way we are using your personal information, or would like to correct or request that we delete
      such personal information, you can also send your request to us at
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
.
If you are a California resident or a user in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), UK or Switzerland and would
      like to know more about your rights in connection with your personal information, please see the relevant sections
      below.
Additional Information for California Residents
If you are a California resident, the following information also applies to you and supplements the information
      contained in the Policy in relation to your use of our Services.
Information We Collect and Sources of Information
Our Policy already describes the information we collect and the sources of information – see the above section
      "Information We Collect From or About You". This section organizes that information around the personal
      information categories set out in the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA).
In the past 12 months, we have collected the following information for the following purposes:
Identifiers
: This includes, for example, your name, email address, postal address, Internet Protocol
        address, unique personal identifier, account username or screen name, third party account names and other online
        identifiers. We obtain this information when you provide it to us or otherwise automatically in the course of
        your interactions with our Services.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
: This includes, for example, browser type,
        and language, device and hardware information, gameplay data, and other information regarding your interactions
        with our Services. We obtain this information automatically in the course of your interactions with our
        Services.
Demographic information / Protected Classification Characteristics
: This includes information such as
        age and gender. We obtain this information when you provide it to us or otherwise automatically in the course of
        your interactions with our Services.
Commercial Information
: This includes records of products purchased or considered, or other similar
        consuming histories or tendencies. This allows us to provide technical functionality, develop new products and
        services, and analyze your use of them. We obtain this information directly from you or otherwise automatically
        in the course of your interactions with our Services.
Geo-location data
: This includes, for example, your locale, zip code, and general geolocation
        information (based on your IP address). We obtain this information when you provide it to us or otherwise
        automatically in the course of your interactions with our Services.
Audio, Video and other Electronic Data
: This includes audio, electronic, visual or similar information
        such as chat and any interaction that you may have with us (such as for customer service purposes) or with other
        players, such as photos, videos, audio, any information you submit in forums, chat or message boards, and
        feedback or testimonials you provide about our Services. We obtain this information when you provide it to us or
        otherwise automatically in the course of your interactions with our Services.
Profiles and Inferences
: This includes inferences drawn from any of the information identified above to
        create a profile reflecting preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence,
        abilities, and aptitudes. We obtain this information automatically in the course of your interactions with our
        Services.
We collect personal data directly from you, automatically from your use of our Services, from unaffiliated
      parties (for example, when you use the Social Login feature to connect with us), and by using or combining
      personal data to derive additional personal data about you, as described in the section “Personal Data We Collect”
      above.
How We Use and Share Information
We collect and use personal information for the business and commercial purposes as described in the section "How
      We Use Information" above.
Crazy Maple Studio does not share your personal information except as approved by you or as otherwise described
      in this Policy. You can find more information in the section “How We Disclose Your Information” above. In the
      preceding 12 months, we have disclosed the following categories of personal information for a business purpose:
Identifiers such as those set forth above;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Demographic information / Protected Classification Characteristics;
Commercial Information;
Geo-location data;
Audio, Video and other Electronic Data; and
Profiles and Inferences.
We do not sell personal information about our users or players. However, we permit certain third party
      advertising and analytics partners to collect information about consumers through our Services for purposes of
      serving ads that are more relevant, for ad campaign measurement and analytics, and for ad fraud detection and
      reporting. The information collected by our partners include GAID (Google Advertising ID on Android devices) or
      IDFA (Identifier for Advertising on iOS devices), region (i.e. the location where a given language is used),
      geo-location information (with your consent) and IP address. For more information or to opt out of the use of your
      data for advertising purposes, please see the section on 'Interest-Based Advertising' above.
Your Privacy Rights
Under the CCPA, California residents have the following rights:
Right to Know:
You have the right to request that we disclose to you the personal information we have
        collected, used and disclosed over the past 12 months, and information about our data practices;
Right to Request Deletion:
You have the right to request that we delete your personal information that
        we have collected from you;
Right to Non-Discrimination:
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
Right to Opt-Out of Sales:
We do not sell personal information, so we do not have an opt-out.
Right to be Notified of Financial Incentives:
You have the right to be notified of any financial
        incentives offers and their material terms, the right to opt-out of such incentives at any time, and may not be
        included in such incentives without their prior informed opt-in consent. We do not offer any such incentives at
        this time.
California law also permits you to request certain information regarding the disclosure of your personal
      information by us and our related companies to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes. We
      do not disclose your personal information to third parties for their own direct marketing purposes.
Because there is not yet a common understanding of how to interpret Do Not Track signals, we do not currently
      respond to "Do Not Track" signals. However, we provide you with the ability to opt-out of the use of tracking
      technologies to send you interest-based advertising as explained above.
To exercise any of the above rights, or if you are an agent authorized to exercise a right under the CCPA, you
      can email
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
or
      contact us
      by mail at the address provided below.
Please note that to protect your information, we may need to verify your identity before processing your request.
      In some cases, we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity, such as a government issued
      ID.
Under the CCPA, you may exercise these rights yourself or you may designate an authorized agent to make these
      requests on your behalf. We may request that your authorized agent have written permission from you to make
      requests on your behalf and may need to verify your authorized agent’s identity.
For more information about our privacy practices, you may email reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com or contact
      us
      by mail at the address provided below.
Additional Information For Users In The European Economic Area (EEA), The United Kingdom And Switzerland
If you are a resident of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, the following information applies with respect to
      personal data collected through your use of our Services.
Data Controller
Crazy Maple Studios, Inc. is the data controller of your personal data.
Legal Basis for Processing Your Personal Data
We collect, use and share your personal data on the basis of the following:
Performance of Contract:
We process your personal data as necessary to perform our contract with you to
        provide the Services including to:
administer your account with us;
provide contests or promotions in which you have enrolled;
support purchases you make;
support game functionality; or
provide customer support.
Consent:
We process your personal data based on your consent. This includes, for example, providing:
newsletters, direct e-mails and surveys about our Services;
targeted ads in our mobile games; and
certain other marketing features.
Legitimate Interest
: We process your personal data where we have a legitimate interest to do so and where
        those interests do not override your fundamental rights and freedoms related to data privacy. This includes, for
        example, processing:
to provide you with requested customer service or technical support;
to debug and improve our current and future Services;
in order to give you exclusive content, personalize your gaming experience with us and contact you in
            accordance with applicable marketing preferences; and
for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims or whenever courts are acting in their judicial
            capacity.
Legal Obligation
: We also process your personal data for compliance with a legal obligation to which we
        are subject.
International Data Transfers
Personal data we collect may be transferred to, and stored and processed in, the United States or any other
      country in which we or our affiliates, partners or service providers maintain facilities or business operations.
      We will ensure that transfers of personal data to a third country or an international organization are subject to
      appropriate safeguards.
Your Privacy Rights
You have the following rights in respect of your personal data:
Rights to Access, Correct and Delete: You have the right to view, correct, update, or request the deletion of
        your personal data as set out in detail in the Accessing and Deleting Your Information section above.
Right to Object: Where we process your personal data based on legitimate interests, you may object to the
        processing of your personal data based on grounds relating to your particular situation. For example, you may
        control the extent to which we market to you and you have the right to request that we stop sending you
        marketing messages at any time. You can use the methods described in the "Your Choices" section above.
Right to Withdraw Consent: Where we process your personal data based on your consent, you have the right to
        withdraw such consent to further use of your personal data at any time. You can use the methods described in the
        "Your Choices" section above to update your marketing preferences.
Right to Port Data: In certain circumstances, you can request that we transfer or port personal data that you
        have provided to us.
For each of the rights described above, you can send your request to
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
or by using the
      contact
      details set out below.
We hope that we can satisfy queries you may have about the way we process your personal data. However, if you
      have unresolved concerns you also have the right to complain to the relevant data protection authority. You can
      bring the complaint in your member state of residence, place of work or where an alleged infringement of data
      protection law occurred. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. Contact
      details for data protection authorities in the European Economic Area and Switzerland are available
here
.
Contact Information
If you have any questions about this Policy, please contact us at:
Crazy Maple Studio, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Policy
1277 Borregas Ave
Sunnyvale, CA 94089
Email:
reelshort.support@crazymaplestudio.com
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 1
https://www.tenjin.io/privacy/:
LAST UPDATED: February 25, 2025
Tenjin, Inc. is concerned about privacy issues and wants you to be familiar with how we collect, use and disclose information. The first section of this document describes our practices in connection with information that we collect from our customers and potential customers through the websites operated by us from which you are accessing this Privacy Policy (the “Websites”), and from users of the Websites (whether or not such users are our customers). The Websites include tenjin.io, tenjin.com, blog.tenjin.io, blog.tenjin.com, docs.tenjin.io, docs.tenjin.com, track.tenjin.io, track.tenjin.com, and dashboard.tenjin.com. The second section describes the information we collect in the course of providing services to our customers (the “Services”). If you are a Tenjin employee or contractor and want to learn how Tenjin uses your personal information, you can find that information in the “Tenjin Notice of Data Privacy for Employees” posted in Confluence.
European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”) and the United Kingdom’s Data Protection Act (the “UKDPA”)
Tenjin provides tools and services to mobile app developers so that they can track and analyze certain End User actions in the context of mobile marketing. Tenjin does not collect any data directly (except from the companies and people that sign up for Tenjin or request marketing info, which is described in the Website Privacy Policy below). With regard to Tenjin’s Services, under the EU’s General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”) and the UK’s Data Protection Act (the “UKDPA”), Tenjin is a data processor. As a data processor, Tenjin processes, and may store, information sent by Tenjin customers from their mobile apps. Tenjin’s customers may send information about the End Users of their apps, and the users’ devices, to Tenjin for processing and storage. The mobile app developers must receive your consent in order for Tenjin to process, and perhaps store, your data. Tenjin recognizes your right of access under Section 15 of GDPR and Section 45 of UKDPA. If you are a user of a Tenjin customer’s mobile app, and you wish to exercise your right of access, you must contact the owner or operator of the mobile app (the data collector).
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)
The California Consumer Privacy Act (the “CCPA”) became law on January 1st, 2020 but enforcement begins six (6) months from the date the California Attorney General issues final regulations (which shall be no later than July 1st, 2020). With regard to Tenjin’s Services, under CCPA, Tenjin is a service provider. As a service provider, Tenjin processes, and may store, information sent by Tenjin customers from their mobile apps. Tenjin’s customers may send information about the End Users of their apps, and the users’ devices, to Tenjin for processing and storage. Tenjin customers must comply with the opt-out requirements under CCPA (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.120(a)) and take into account any exceptions or other requirements mandated by law. As a service provider, Tenjin relies on CCPA’s business purpose exemption under Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.140(t)(2)(C) and as a service provider, Tenjin does not have any direct obligations to the End Users to obtain consent, provide opt-outs, or delete data. If you are a user of a Tenjin customer’s mobile app and you wish to opt-out or exercise another right under CCPA, you must contact the app publisher (the business).
The above applies to both Section 1 and Section 2 below.
SECTION 1: WEBSITE PRIVACY POLICY
Personal Information
“Personal Information” is information that identifies you as an individual or relates to an identifiable person. We collect Personal Information, such as name, organization name and email address, from our customers and potential customers when they provide it to us through the Services (such as by creating an Account), through the Website, or via email sent to a Tenjin email address.
How We May Use Personal Information
We may use Personal Information:
To respond to your inquiries and fulfill your requests.
To send administrative information to you, such as information regarding our services and changes to our terms, conditions and policies.
To provide you with customer service.
To send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you.
For our business purposes, such as data analysis, audits, fraud monitoring and prevention, developing new products, enhancing, improving or modifying our services, identifying usage trends, determining the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns and operating and expanding our business activities.
As we believe necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to enforce our terms and conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
How Personal Information May Be Disclosed
Your Personal Information may be disclosed:
To our affiliated and third-party service providers and consultants who provide services such as website hosting, data analysis, payment processing, order fulfillment, information technology and related infrastructure provision, customer service, email delivery, auditing and other similar services.
To a third party in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceedings).
As we believe necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to enforce our terms and conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
OTHER INFORMATION
“Other Information” is any information that does not reveal your specific identity or does not directly relate to an individual, such as browser and device information; information collected through cookies, pixel tags and other technologies; and aggregated information.
How We May Collect Other Information
We and our third party service providers may collect Other Information in a variety of ways, including:
Using cookies: Cookies are pieces of information stored directly on the device that you are using to access the Websites. Cookies allow us to collect information such as browser type, time spent on the Websites, pages visited and other anonymous traffic data. If you do not want information collected through the use of cookies, there is a simple procedure in most browsers that allows you to automatically decline cookies, or be given the choice of declining or accepting the transfer to your computer of a particular cookie (or cookies) from a particular site. Please note, however, that if you don’t accept Cookies, you may not be able to access all portions or features of the Websites. Some third-party services providers that we engage (including third-party advertisers) may also place their own Cookies on your hard drive. Note that this Privacy Policy covers only our use of Cookies and does not include use of Cookies by such third parties.
Using pixel tags and other similar technologies: Pixel tags (also known as web beacons and clear GIFs) may be used in connection with the Websites to, among other things, track the actions of users (including email recipients), measure the success of our marketing campaigns and compile statistics about use of the Websites.
Using a third-party analytics provider: We use Google Analytics and Hubspot for our Website analytics. These providers use cookies and similar technologies to analyze how users use the Websites, compile statistical reports on Website activity, and provide other services related to the Websites. They may also collect information about Website visitors’ use of other websites. For more information about Google Analytics, including how to opt out, please go to:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. For more information on Hubspot’s privacy practices, please go to:
https://legal.hubspot.com/privacy-policy
.
IP Address: Your IP Address is a number that is automatically assigned to your computer by your Internet Service Provider (ISP). An IP Address may be identified and logged automatically in our server log files whenever a user accesses the Websites, along with the time of the visit and the page(s) visited. Collecting IP Addresses is standard practice and is done automatically by many websites, applications and other services. We use IP Addresses for purposes such as calculating usage levels, diagnosing server problems and administering the Websites.
By aggregating information: Aggregated Personal Information does not personally identify you (for example, we may aggregate Personal Information to calculate the percentage of our users who have a particular telephone area code).
How We May Use and Disclose Other Information
We may use and disclose Other Information for any purpose, except where we are required to do otherwise under applicable law. If we are required to treat Other Information as Personal Information under applicable law, then we may use it for all the purposes for which we use and disclose Personal Information. In some instances, we may combine Other Information with Personal Information. If we do, we will treat the combined information as Personal Information as long as it is combined.
THIRD PARTY SERVICES
This Privacy Policy does not address, and we are not responsible for, the privacy, information or other practices of any third parties, including any third party operating any site or service to which the Websites link. The inclusion of a link on the Websites does not imply endorsement of the linked site or service by us or by our affiliates.
SECURITY
We take reasonable administrative, physical and electronic measures designed to protect Personal Information and Other Information from unauthorized access, use or disclosure. Data collected from your device is encrypted using SSL or other technologies. Please be aware, however, that no method of transmitting information over the Internet or storing information is completely secure. Accordingly, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of any information.
CROSS-BORDER TRANSFER
The Websites are controlled and operated by us from the United States, and are not intended to subject us to the laws or jurisdiction of any state, country or territory other than that of the United States. Your Personal Information may be stored and processed in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, and by using the Websites you consent to the transfer of information to countries outside of your country of residence, including the United States, which may have different data protection rules than those of your country.
MODIFYING INFORMATION
Customers can access and modify their billing address by emailing
privacy@tenjin.com
. If customers want to delete their own Customer Data or their Account from the Services, customers can contact us at
privacy@tenjin.com
with a request. We will delete the Customer Data but some information may remain in archived/backup copies for our records or as otherwise required by law. If a customer ceases subscribing to the Services, please email
privacy@tenjin.com
and we’ll automatically delete the customer’s Account and take steps to delete that customer’s Customer Data from the Services.
UPDATES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We may change this Privacy Policy. The “Last Updated” legend at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last revised. Any changes will become effective when we post the revised Privacy Policy on the Websites. Your use of the Websites following these changes means that you accept the revised Privacy Policy.
CONTACTING US
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
privacy@tenjin.com
.
SECTION 2: SERVICES PRIVACY POLICY
CUSTOMER DATA
Our customers are advertisers. On behalf of a customer, we receive data about its advertising campaign on a particular advertising network directly from that network. “Customer Data” means advertising campaign data or information made available to Tenjin or the Tenjin Platform by or on behalf of a customer or any Authorized User, or via a customer’s use of the Tenjin Platform. We format and otherwise process the Customer Data, to help our customer understand and analyze the effectiveness of and costs associated with its advertising campaigns across various advertising networks.
HOW WE COLLECT CUSTOMER DATA
We collect Customer Data through Tenjin’s software development kit (“Tenjin SDK”) that customers have a license to use. We may also collect Customer Data from our customers’ third party mobile marketing partners, to the extent that the customer has authorized us to do so.
HOW WE USE CUSTOMER DATA
We use Customer Data to provide the Services to the relevant customer. We may also use it to improve the Services and develop new products and services.
We do not share Customer Data with any customer other than the customer to which it relates, unless we have received the prior express written consent of the customer to do otherwise. Without consent, we may disclose Customer Data:
To our affiliated and third-party service providers; and To a third party in the event of any reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceedings).
In addition, we may use or disclose Customer Data as we believe necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to enforce our terms and conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
Unless prohibited by applicable law or advertising network terms, we may aggregate Customer Data such that it is not reasonably identifiable with or to the customer to which it relates, or the customer’s end users (“Aggregate Data”). We may share Aggregate Data with third parties for industry research and analysis, demographic profiling and other similar purposes.
HOW WE COLLECT AND PROCESS END USER DATA FOR CUSTOMERS
Customers may send information about individuals using their app (“End Users”) to Tenjin for processing and storage. This information may include Vendor ID (if available), IP address, Apple Search attribution (if enabled), Bundle ID, SDK Version, App Version, OS Version, Device Type, Device Model, Device Locale, Device Country, OS Platform, Limit Ad Tracking setting, and Advertising ID. Advertising IDs are user-specific, unique character strings that can be reset by the user and are used to track an End User’s device for advertising purposes. Examples include Google Ad ID and IDFA.
Tenjin customers must abide by all applicable laws and obtain all applicable consents before sending End User data to Tenjin. If you feel that your data has been collected by a Tenjin customer without your consent, please contact the Tenjin customer directly. If you would like to access, modify or delete your data collected by a Tenjin customer, please contact the Tenjin customer directly.
Tenjin also recognizes the Right to Erasure under Article 17 of GDPR. For erasure requests, since Tenjin is a data processor, please contact the Tenjin customer directly with your deletion request.
HOW WE PROCESS AND SECURE DATA
Tenjin is a SaaS company whose solutions are built on the AWS platform. Data is processed by Tenjin in secure locations operated by Amazon (AWS) in the United States.
Tenjin uses appropriate and reasonable measures to protect data from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, while taking into account any inherent risks and the nature of the data. Additional details on AWS security certifications and procedures can be found here:
https://d1.awsstatic.com/whitepapers/Security/AWS_Security_Whitepaper.pdf
.
QUESTIONS
Please contact us at
privacy@tenjin.com
if you have any questions about our Privacy Policy or Tenjin’s compliance with GDPR or CCPA. Please email
privacy@tenjin.com
if you would like to contact Tenjin’s Data Protection Officer (DPO), or EU representative under GDPR Article 27.
Tenjin Joins Meta’s Mobile Measurement Partner (MMP) Program
We’re thrilled to announce that Tenjin has officially joined  Meta’s Mobile Measurement Partners (MMP) program, a significant milestone in our 10-year journey of empowering mobile publishers.  What Does Meta’s MMP Status Mean for You? As an official MMP, Tenjin is now recognized as an official partner for mobile app attribution and analytics. This means Tenjin…
The State of Mobile Gaming in Brazil 2025: Data, Trends, and Market Analysis
In this post, we delve into the latest data, trends, and insights that showcase the state of mobile gaming in Brazil in 2025.  Drawing from exclusive industry reports, and insights from a leading local expert, we’ll explore the factors driving this remarkable growth, and the unique characteristics of the Brazilian gaming market. The State of…
TikTok Advanced Dedicated Campaigns are now available for Tenjin users
Advanced Dedicated Campaigns (ADC) are now available for Tenjin customers on TikTok for Business. ADC enhances your ability to optimize iOS campaigns on TikTok, providing improved performance and advanced reporting features. What is ADC? ADC is a campaign type offered by TikTok that enables advertisers to maximize their performance on iOS devices. With advanced optimization…
Mobile App Retention Explained: Absolute vs. Relative
As a mobile app developer or marketer, Day 1 retention is one of the most crucial metrics to understand the success of your mobile app or game. Understanding the difference between absolute vs. relative retention can be a game-changer for your user acquisition, publishing, and analytics strategies. Yet, many mobile publishers aren’t fully aware of…
×
We and selected third parties collect personal information as specified in the
privacy policy
and use cookies or similar technologies for technical purposes and, with your consent, for
experience, measurement and “marketing (personalized ads)”
as specified in the
cookie policy
.
You can freely give, deny, or withdraw your consent at any time by accessing the preferences panel.  Denying consent may make related features unavailable.
Use the “Accept” button to consent. Use the “Reject” button to continue without accepting.
Press again to continue 0/1
Learn more and customize
Reject
Accept
Sub-policy 2
http://vungle.com/privacy/:
Vungle
privacy
Last Updated:
December 17, 2019
Vungle, Inc. and its group companies (“
Vungle
“, “
we
” or “
us
“) respect your privacy. This privacy notice (“Notice”) explains who we are, how we collect, use and share personal information about you, and how you can exercise your privacy rights.
This Notice covers personal information we collect:
when providing the Vungle Ad Services (see
Section 2
); and
when you visit one of our Websites, and in the usual course of our business, such as in connection with our events, sales and marketing activities (see
Section 3
).
QUICK LINKS
We recommend that you read this Notice in full to ensure you are fully informed. However, to make it easier for you to review those parts of this Notice which apply to you, we have divided up the document into the following sections:
1. WHO WE ARE
(applicable to everyone)
2. VUNGLE AD SERVICES
(applicable to End Users)
2.1 What information do we collect?
2.2 How do we use your information?
2.3 How does Vungle use its technology to collect information?
2.4 Your Opt-Out Choices
2.5 How Do We Share Information?
2.6 Privacy Practices of Vungle Clients
2.7 Minors and Children
3. VUNGLE WEBSITES
(applicable to End Users and visitors to our Websites)
3.1 What information do we collect?
3.2 How do we use your information?
3.3 Cookies and Similar Technologies
3.4 How Do We Share Information?
4. GENERAL INFORMATION
(applicable to everyone).
4.1 How do we share your information?
4.2 Your data protection rights
4.3 Additional information for California Residents.
4.4 Legal basis for processing personal information (EEA residents only).
4.5 Third-Party Websites and Apps
4.6 How do we keep your personal information secure?
4.7 Data Retention
4.8 International Data Transfers
4.9 EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Notice
4.10 Questions or complaints.
4.11 Changes to this Notice
4.12 Contact Us
We participate in and comply with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework to cover data we process from the European Union (“EU”). For further information, please review our EU-U.S.
Privacy Shield Notice
1. WHO WE ARE
Vungle is an ad network providing a technology platform (“
Platform
”) for Clients that want to advertise and/or monetize their applications, games, and other products. Our “
Clients
” include “
Advertisers
” that wish to distribute ad content through the Vungle Platform, and “
Publishers
” of applications that want to display relevant ads to end users (“
End Users
“) of third party applications (“
apps
“) that use our SDKs, APIs, hosted video advertising platform and/or any of our related advertising tools (collectively, the “
Vungle Ad Services
“).
Advertising revenue helps keep many games and apps free, and Vungle works hard to ensure that our ads are interesting, relevant, and safe for End Users.
2. VUNGLE AD SERVICES
This Section describes how Vungle collects and uses information we receive from End Users (“
you
“) of apps that use the Vungle Ad Services.
2.1 What information do we collect?
When you use an app supported by Vungle technology (see Section 2.3,
below
, our services can collect certain information about your mobile device. Some of this information (including for example, your IP address and certain unique identifiers), may identify a particular computer or device and may be “personal information” or “personal data” as defined under law in some jurisdictions (including in California and the EU, respectively) (hereinafter, collectively referred to as “
personal information
”). We collect this information the first time Vungle’s SDK is initialized on a Publisher Client’s app. Note, however, that Vungle’s Ad Services do not collect any information that that enables us to identify End Users personally (such as your name, address, or email address).
LEARN MORE
The information we collect includes:
Information about your device
, such as the type and model, manufacturer, operating system (e.g. iOS, Android, etc.), carrier name, time zone, network connection type (e.g., Wi-Fi, cellular), IP address, Vungle SDK version, information about the Publisher Client’s app currently active on your device (but not any other apps), and identifiers assigned to your device, such as its iOS Identifier for Advertising (IDFA), Android Advertising ID (AAID or GAID), or other unique device identifier (a number uniquely allocated to your device by your device manufacturer or Publisher Client’s app).
Information about your behavior on our Publisher Client’s app
, such as information about the activities or actions on those apps, and session start/stop time. Historic versions of Vungle technology may also collect geolocation information (e.g., latitude and longitude co-ordinates), but only (i) if the Publisher Client’s app has enabled location services on your device and (ii) you have granted the Publisher permission to collect this information). However, versions that are current as of the date of this Notice no longer collect geolocation information.
Information about ads served, viewed, or clicked on
, such as the type of ad, where the ad was served, whether you clicked on it, the number of times you have seen the ad, the number of Vungle ads viewed per session, and whether you visited the Advertiser’s website or relevant app store and/or purchased or installed the product or service advertised.
We may also combine and/or enhance the information we collect about your device, including the personal information, with information we may collect about your interactions with other ads served through Vungle’s Platform that you may view on other Publisher Client’s Apps, or with information collected from our Clients and third parties (such as data providers). This may include, for example, mobile device IDs, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on an app to help make the ads served to you more relevant while limiting your exposure to less relevant ads. We (or our third party partners) may also use this additional information to undertake “user matching,” which means that in addition to the ID an End User has been assigned in our system, we may also receive a list of unique IDs our external partners or Clients have assigned to an End User.
2.2 How do we use your information?
We use the information, including the personal information, we collect (sometimes in combination with information provided and sourced by independent validation partners) for a variety of business purposes, including the following:
Serving Ads:
To allow Publishers to offer advertising inventory in their apps, and Advertisers to bid on and display ads in that inventory.
Ad Reporting and Conversions:
: To allow Vungle to confirm with Advertisers information about when and how End Users have been exposed to their ads, clicked on their ads, or visited their website and to ensure accurate billing for advertising services rendered.
Frequency Capping:
Preventing End Users from seeing the same ad too many times.
Customizing Ads:
To customize and more effectively tailor the ads we display to you and to optimize the display of ads (including limiting your exposure to less relevant ads).
Performance Analytics and Optimization:
To analyze and optimize ad performance, such as tracking views of ads, implementing end user “whitelists” or “blacklists” (to ensure, in some cases, that certain ads are being viewed by appropriate audiences), as well as click-through rates to websites or app stores and/or installs of apps that have been advertised.
Fraud Detection and Prevention:
Identifying invalid clicks, installs, or ad queries, and protecting us and our Clients from fraudulent behavior.
Providing and Improving the Vungle Ad Services:
Auditing, researching, and analyzing data in order to provide, protect, and improve the Vungle Ad Services and to ensure that our technologies function properly.
2.3
How does Vungle use its technology to collect information
?
We use our technology (in some jurisdictions, such as the EU, these may be referred to as “tracking technologies”) to collect information automatically from your device to perform many of the functions described in “
How do we use your information?
” above. To opt out of our use of such technologies, please follow the instructions for opting out in the apps, as described in “
Opt-Out Choices
” below.
LEARN MORE
The standard tracking technologies we use include:
Mobile “SDKs” or “Software Development Kits” (including our own SDKs):
These are blocks of code that are embedded into an app allowing Vungle to collect certain information (as described in “
2.1 What information do we collect?
” above relating to your use of apps using our technology. The embedded code from Vungle’s SDK allows the app to “speak” with Vungle’s Platform for purposes of delivering ads.
Mobile device identifiers:
We also use standard device identifiers, for example the IDFA advertising identifier used on Apple’s iOS devices and the GAID advertising identifier used on Android devices, to monitor and improve the performance of the ads we show you.
Third-Party Ad Measurement URLs/Links:
Additionally, in providing the Vungle Ad Services to our Advertiser Clients, the Vungle ads may include URLs or links from the Advertiser Client’s chosen third-party measurement partner to collect information about your interaction with those ads. The information collected is used for ad delivery, reporting, and billing purposes and may also be used for performance optimization.
“Tags and Pixels”:
These are blocks of code that we and our Clients may use to monitor your interaction with apps using our technology. We may use these to synchronize information that we have collected with information independently collected by our Clients and other third party advertising platforms and advertisers that are interested in providing you with ads.
2.4 Your Opt-Out Choices.
You can opt out of having your information being used by Vungle for performance-based advertising by accessing your mobile device settings and following the most recent published instructions. If you limit ad tracking, you will still see advertisements (even ones sourced from Vungle’s network), but Vungle will no longer be able to use the personal information described above in
Section 2.1
to serve you with more relevant ads. In addition, the advertising identifier (along with any information collected about that identifier) that was previously assigned to you will also be disassociated. This means that if at a later stage, you decide to opt back in, we will not be able to use any of your past information for advertising purposes, and you will (for all practical purposes) be a new user to our system. For apps using older versions of the Vungle SDK, you may also stop the collection of location information by particular apps that may allow collection of location of this information by changing the preferences on your mobile device.
2.5 How Do We Share Information?
Please see Section 4.1,
below
for information concerning how Vungle shares the information collected.
2.6 Privacy Practices of Vungle Clients.
Vungle is not responsible for the information practices of our Clients or their agents. We require our Clients to comply with all applicable laws and regulations and to provide End Users with notice of the collection of data for advertising purposes as outlined in this Notice. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of apps you visit for information about those apps’ data collection and use practices.
2.7 Minors and Children.
Our Clients are responsible for ensuring that their mobile apps comply with data privacy protection legislation applicable to minors and children, such as the United States’ Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
“), including where relevant by obtaining parental consent prior to the collection of personal information. With respect to COPPA specifically, we rely upon our Publisher Clients to confirm whether or not their app is subject to COPPA. As required by COPPA, Vungle will enable a flag in our system when a Client indicates their app is subject to COPPA such that the End User’s device history is disassociated, and the only End User personal information used by the Vungle Ad Services would be persistent identifiers (e.g., IP address and device identifiers) to provide “support for internal operations” of the Vungle Ad Services (as permitted by COPPA).
3. VUNGLE WEBSITES
This Section describes how we collect and use Information in the usual course of business, including through our websites (such as
“http://vungle.com”
or any other website on which this Notice is posted) and other corporate services, web portals, and dashboards we make available to our Clients and End Users (collectively “
Websites
“), as well as in connection with our events, sales and marketing activities. This section does not apply to information collection through apps that use the Vungle Ad Services.
3.1 What information do we collect?
Information that you provide voluntarily:
Certain parts of our Websites may ask you to provide personal information voluntarily. For example, when Clients are registering for a Vungle account, expressing an interest in obtaining additional information about Vungle or our products and services, subscribing to marketing or otherwise contacting us, Vungle collects required personal information from you. The personal information that you are asked to provide (and the reasons why you are asked to provide it) will be made clear to you at the point we ask you to provide your personal information. We will also let you know prior to collection whether the provision of personal information we are collecting is compulsory or may be provided on a voluntary basis, and the consequences (if any) of not providing the information. We also collect personal information you otherwise submit to us, such as when you send Vungle an email.
LEARN MORE
The personal information we collect may include contact information (such as your name, address, telephone number or email address) and contact preferences. It may also include professional information, such as your job title, department or job role, as well as the nature of your request or communication. We also collect information you choose to provide to us when completing any ‘free text’ boxes in our forms (for example, for event sign-up, product feedback or survey requests).
Information we collect automatically:
When using our Websites, we may automatically collect certain information from your device or computer. In some countries, including countries in the EU, this information may be considered personal information under data protection laws.Specifically, the information we collect automatically may include your IP address, your operating system, your browser ID, your browsing activity, and other information about your system and connection, and how you interact with our Websites and other websites. We may collect this information as a part of log files as well as through the use of cookies or other tracking technologies, as explained further under the heading “
Cookies and similar tracking technology
.”
Information we collect from third party sources:
We may obtain information about you from other sources, such as public databases, joint marketing partners, data providers, and social media platforms. Examples of the information we could receive from other sources include account information, page-views, and browsing information.
3.2 How do we use your information?
We use the information we collect or receive to:
Send you marketing and promotional communications.
For example, we and/or our third party marketing partners may use the personal information you send to us for our marketing purposes, if this is in accordance with your marketing preferences. However, you will always be able to opt-out of our marketing at any time (see the “
Your Choices
” section above).
Send administrative information to you.
For example, to send you product, service, and new feature information and/or information about changes to our terms, conditions, and policies.
Engage in and process transactions.
For example, we may use your personal information along with financial, credit card, and/or payment information that you provide to us to process your transactions and for billing purposes. Note that Vungle uses third-party vendors to collect and/or process any financial or payment information, and does not itself collect, receive, or process financial or payment information on its own.
Respond to your requests.
For example, we may use your personal information to fulfill your request for a quote or customer support, or to provide you with information you have requested about the Websites or Vungle Ad Services.
Post testimonials.
We post testimonials on the Websites that may contain personal information. Prior to posting a testimonial, we will obtain our consent to use your name and testimonial. If you wish to update, or delete your testimonial, please contact us at
privacy@vungle.com
and be sure to include your name, testimonial location, and contact information.
Manage your account and provide support or other services.
For example, for the creation or administration of your Vungle account, to communicate with you, and to provide you with customer support or other services you have ordered, such as product updates, product patches and fixes and other similar operational communications.
Select content and improve quality.
We may use your information to help improve the Website, Vungle Ad Services, and to ensure that content on the Websites is presented in the most effective manner for your device (for example, by presenting products and offers tailored to you).
Protect the Vungle Websites.
We may use your information as part of our efforts to keep the Websites safe and secure (for example, for fraud monitoring and prevention).
For our business purposes.
We may use your information for our business purposes, such as data analysis, audits, identifying usage trends, determining the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns, and to evaluate and improve our products, services, marketing, and client relationships.
3.3 Cookies and Similar Technologies.
We may use cookies and similar technology (collectively “
cookies
”) on our Websites to collect and process personal information about you. At any time, you may use your browser settings to change your cookie preferences or control use of cookies.  By continuing to browse, you agree to our use of cookies.  We also use Google Analytics to learn more about usage of our Websites. You can learn more about Google Analytics, including how to opt-out, by visiting
here
.
3.4 How Do We Share Information?
Please see Section 4.1
, below for information concerning how Vungle shares the information collected.
4. GENERAL INFORMATION
4.1 How do we share your information?
We may disclose your personal information to the following categories of recipients:
Advertiser Clients.
If you are an End User, we may exchange information with our Advertiser Clients in connection with the Vungle Ad Services for purposes relevant to our business relationships with them, such as for billing purposes, dispute resolution, or fraud prevention, and to help them identify and/or buy our Publisher Client’s advertising inventory. Our Advertiser Clients are obligated to use the information they receive in compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
Attribution Partners and Mobile Measurement Partners.
Acting on behalf of and as third-party agents for our Advertiser Clients, if you are an End User, we may exchange information (such as your mobile device ID) with our Advertiser Clients’ attribution and mobile measurement partners to validate and measure the success of ads delivered via the Platform for billing purposes.
Vendors, consultants and other service providers.
We may share your information with third party vendors, service providers, contractors or agents who perform functions required for the operation of our business. Examples include to provide data storage and processing services, fraud prevention, technical support for our Platform, analyzing data and performing analysis related to the Website, Platform and related services, and delivering content.
Compliance with laws.
We may disclose information where we are legally required to do so in order to comply with applicable law, governmental requests, a judicial proceeding, court order, or other legal process, such as in response to a court order or a subpoena (including in response to public authorities to meet national security or law enforcement requirements).
Disclosures for national security or law enforcement.
Under certain circumstances, we may be required to disclose your personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Vital interests and legal rights.
We may disclose information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our Terms of Use or this Notice, or as evidence in litigation in which Vungle may be involved.
Vungle affiliates.
Vungle is headquartered in San Francisco, CA, but we have subsidiary and affiliate offices in London, UK; Berlin, Germany; Tokyo, Japan; Seoul, Korea; Beijing, China; and Singapore, Singapore. A list of our group companies is available here
https://vungle.com/contact-us
. We may share information with our parent companies, subsidiaries and/or affiliates for use and processing purposes described in this Notice.
Business transfers.
We may share or transfer information in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company, provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this Notice.
Consent.
We may share your information with any other person with your consent to the disclosure.
4.2 Your data protection rights.
Promotional Emails:
You can opt out of receiving promotional emails from us by clicking the “unsubscribe” link in the email, by emailing unsubscribe@vungle.com. If you choose to no longer receive marketing information, we may still communicate with you regarding such things as your security updates, product functionality, responses to service requests, or other transactional, non-marketing/administrative related purposes.
Other Rights (applicable to California and EEA residents only):
If you are a resident of California or the European Economic Area (“EEA”), legislation in your jurisdiction – such as the California Consumer Protection Act (“CCPA”) and the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), respectively – affords you certain specific data protection rights, as noted below. If you make a request, to protect your privacy and security, we will take steps to verify your identity and requests before granting the rights set forth in this Notice.
CCPA rights (California residents)
You can request
access to or ask that we delete
your personal information at any time. Please note that, under certain circumstances, we have the right to impose a small fee for access and disclosure of your personal information where permitted under applicable law, which will be communicated to you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under California law.  For example, we may retain certain information for legal compliance and to secure our Services.
Vungle does not “sell” personal information
within the meaning of the CCPA. Nevertheless, Vungle will honor any “opt-out of sale” requests we may receive from our Clients, and accordingly take reasonable measures to prevent any further downstream sales. Vungle does share personal information as described in this Notice.
If you are a California resident seeking to exercise your CCPA rights, please (i) email us at
CCPA@vungle.com
, or (ii) visit our website and complete the webform to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
GDPR rights (EEA residents)
You can request
access to or that we change, update or delete
your personal information at any time by contacting us at
privacy@vungle.com
. Please note that we may impose a small fee for access and disclosure of your personal information where permitted under applicable law, which will be communicated to you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law. For example, we may retain certain information for legal compliance and to secure our Services.
You can
object to processing
of your personal information, ask us to
restrict processing
of your personal information or
request portability
of your personal information. To exercise these rights email
privacy@vungle.com
.
If we have collected and processed your personal information with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain to a data protection authority
about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
“) are available
here
.
Please note that because most of the information we store can only identify a particular browser or device, and cannot identify you individually, you will need to provide us with some additional information to enable us to identify the personal information we hold about you and ensure that we accurately fulfil your request.
4.3 Additional information for California Residents.
California law requires us to provide California residents with some additional information regarding how we collect, use, and share your “personal information” (as defined in the CCPA). Throughout this Notice, we discuss in detail the specific pieces of information we collect from you or your device and discuss how we use and share such information.
As described in detail in
Section 2.1
above, we may collect the following categories of information about you through the Vungle Ad Services: device identifiers (such as IP address); internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or app usage); geolocation information; and other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with your device.
As described in detail in
Section 3.1
above, we may collect the following categories of information about you through your use of the Websites: identifiers (such as name and contact information); commercial information (such as transaction data); financial data (such as credit card information through our payment processors); device identifiers (such as IP address); internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or app usage); geolocation information; and other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with you.
We disclose the following categories of personal information for business purposes: identifiers; commercial information; financial data (via our payment processors); device identifiers; internet or other network or device activity; geolocation information; and other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with you.
As described in detail in
Section 2.2
and
Section 3.3
above, we use and disclose the information we collect for the business purposes described in this Notice, including: to provide and improve the Vungle Ad Services and the Websites, for our operational purposes, for the operational purposes of our service providers, for audit purposes, to detect security incidents and prevent fraud, for debugging and repairing errors, to communicate with you, to provide customer service, to market Vungle services, and for other uses that we notify you about.
We may disclose your personal information to the categories of recipients described in detail in
Section 4.1
, above.
4.4 Legal basis for processing personal information (EEA residents only).
If you are an individual from the EEA, our legal basis for collecting and using personal information described above will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we normally rely on our legitimate interest to collect personal information from you, except where such interests are overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process your personal information, they include the interests described in the sections headed “How do we use your information?” above (
Section 2.2
and
Section 3.2
.
In some cases, we may rely on our consent or have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If we rely on consent to collect and/or process your personal information, we will obtain such consent in compliance with applicable laws.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us using the details provided under the heading “
Contact Us
” below.
4.5 Third-Party Websites and Apps.
This Notice only applies to the Vungle Websites and Vungle Ad Services. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or disclosures of websites, developers, or apps that use or access the Vungle Services or Vungle Ad Services. In addition, ads within the Vungle Platform may contain links to third-party websites and apps. Any access to and use of such linked websites or apps is not governed by this Notice, but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third parties. We are not responsible for the information practices of such third parties.
4.6 How do we keep your personal information secure?
We use appropriate administrative, organizational, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the personal information we collect and process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal information and to help ensure that your data is safe, secure, and only available to you and to those you provided authorized access. Specific measures we will use include hashing and pseudonymization of data prior to storage. However, no electronic transmission over the Internet or information storage technology can be guaranteed to be 100% secure, so you should take care in deciding what information you send us in this way.
4.7 Data Retention.
We retain personal information we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to comply with applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements, to enforce our agreements or comply with our legal obligations). When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymize such data or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
If you are an End User, we typically store the personal information we collect about you, such as your IP address and other information described above, for 13 months from the date of last collection before we delete, overwrite, or anonymize that data, unless we are required to keep it to comply with a legal or audit obligation.
Please contact us at privacy@vungle.com if you have any questions about the information we collect and/or how we use the information we collect.
4.8 International Data Transfers.
The Vungle Ad Services and Vungle Websites are provided, supported, and hosted in the United States. If you are using the Vungle Ad Services and Vungle Websites from outside the United States, be aware that your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by Vungle in our facilities and by those third parties with whom we may share your personal information, in the United States and other locations including London, Berlin, Tokyo, Seoul, Beijing and Singapore, where we have offices. These countries may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country.
However, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected in accordance with this Notice. These include implementing the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses for transfers of personal information between our group companies, which require all group companies to protect personal information they process from the EEA in accordance with European Union data protection law. Our Standard Contractual Clauses can be provided upon request. We have implemented similar appropriate safeguards with our third party service providers and partners and further details can be provided upon request. .
4.9 EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Notice.
Vungle, Inc. is located in the United States and participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the US Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from EU member countries in the United States.
Vungle adheres to and will abide by the Privacy Shield Principles of Notice, Choice, Accountability for Onward Transfer, Security, Data Integrity and Purpose Limitation, Access, and Recourse, Enforcement, and Liability when processing such personal information.
Vungle is responsible for the processing of personal information it receives under each Privacy Shield Framework and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. We comply with the Privacy Shield Principles for all onward transfers of personal information from the EU, including the onward transfer liability provisions.
With respect to personal information received or transferred pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks, we are subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
For more information about the Privacy Shield, see the US Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield website located at:
https://www.privacyshield.gov
. To review our certification on the Privacy Shield list, see the US Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield self-certification list located at:
https://www.privacyshield.gov/list
.
4.10 Questions or complaints.
You can direct any questions or complaints about the use or disclosure of your personal information to us at
privacy@vungle.com
. We will investigate and attempt to resolve any complaints or disputes regarding the use or disclosure of personal information within 45 days of receiving your complaint.
JAMS (EEA residents only)
If you are an EEA resident and you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider, JAMS, free of charge at
https://www.jamsadr.com/eu-us-privacy-shield
.
Binding arbitration (EEA residents only)
You may have the option to select binding arbitration for the resolution of your complaint under certain circumstances, provided you have taken the following steps: (1) raised your complaint directly with us and provided us the opportunity to resolve the issue; (2) made use of the independent dispute resolution mechanism identified above; and (3) raised the issue through the relevant data protection authority and allowed the US Department of Commerce an opportunity to resolve the complaint at no cost to you. To find out more about the Privacy Shield’s binding arbitration scheme please see
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=My-Rights-under-Privacy-Shield
.
4.11 Changes to this Notice.
Vungle will review and update this Notice periodically and will note the date of its most recent revision above. If we make material changes to this Notice, we will notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes prior to implementing the changes or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to review this Notice frequently to be informed of how Vungle is protecting your information.
4.12 Contact Us.
If you have questions about our privacy practices, or would like to make a complaint, please contact Vungle’s Data Protection Officer by email at
privacy@vungle.com
or by post using the details provided below:
Residents outside of the European Economic Area (EEA)
Vungle, Inc.
Attn: Legal
1255 Battery Street, Suite 500, San Francisco, CA, 94111, United States
European Economic Area (EEA) residents
Vungle Limited
Attn: Data Protection Officer
4th Floor, Farringdon Point, 33 Farringdon Road, London, England, EC1M 3JF
Important note:
If you are resident in the EEA, the “data controller” of your personal information is Vungle, Inc.
This site uses cookies.
Read more
Home
Advertise
Monetize
Creative Labs
Creative Team
Creative Tech
Vungle SDK
Liftoff
GameRefinery
JetFuel
The Plug
TreSensa
Blog
Success Stories
News and Events
Resources
Partners
Careers
Support
About Us
Contact Us
An error has occurred, please try again later.
Sub-policy 3
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Access Denied
You don't have permission to access "http://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy" on this server.
Reference #18.4cb01302.1741278031.32da422b
https://errors.edgesuite.net/18.4cb01302.1741278031.32da422b
Sub-policy 5
https://www.mopub.com/legal/privacy/:
Products
AppDiscovery
Acquire your ideal users
MAX
Monetize your app
SparkLabs
Create ads that perform
AppLovin Exchange
Reach your audience
Array
Increase value across customer’s lifecycle
Adjust
Measure your marketing
Wurl
Our streaming TV solution
Solutions
Increase ARPDAU
Grow Ad Inventory
Acquire App Users
Increase IAPs
Resources
Success Stories
Blog
Video Library
Guides and Reports
Glossary
Events
Partners
View all resources
More about us
Jobs
NEW
Press
About Us
Sign Up
Sign In
ENG
中文
日本語
한국어
Take your monetization
to the next level
Maximize revenue, reduce costs, and save time with MAX
Start earning more
MAXIMIZE REVENUE
Unified Auction
Ad Formats
360° Growth
ANALYZE & OPTIMIZE
Reporting Tools
A/B Testing
SAVE TIME
Mediation Management
Developer Tools
PROTECT YOUR BRAND
Ad Review
User Journey
Creative Debugger
MAXIMIZE REVENUE
Unified Auction
Ad Formats
360° Growth
ANALYZE & OPTIMIZE
Reporting Tools
A/B Testing
SAVE TIME
Mediation Management
Developer Tools
PROTECT YOUR BRAND
Ad Review
User Journey
Creative Debugger
Increase ad revenue
Earn more for your ad inventory with an integrated 360º approach
Unified Auction
Drive the highest yield for your app real estate
Choose the mediation platform with the most competitive demand: 25+ SDK networks, 20+ in-app bidders, premium and diversified DSPs through the AppLovin Exchange, and custom options for anyone else you work with.
AD FORMATS
Expand your revenue opportunities
Leverage all major ad formats for more ways to drive in-app ad revenue, as well as innovative ad placements like app open and lock screen ads.
Native
Interstitial
Rewarded
Playable
Rich Media
MREC
Banner
Display
360° Growth
Scale your ad revenue with more active users
MAX makes it easy to reinvest your revenues and learned insights into user acquisition with AppLovin’s growth engine, AppDiscovery, to unlock self-perpetuating growth.
Optimize your ad revenue strategy
Make smarter decisions with full transparency into your ad revenue data
REPORTING TOOLS
MAX’s suite of reporting tools gives actionable insights on demand
Measure performance across your entire monetization strategy
Gain insights and identify opportunities to improve yield all within a single, comprehensive, customizable dashboard or downloadable report.
Ad Inventory
Track ad performance, overall revenue, and integration health.
Network
Monitor bidding performance and the ability to fill and serve ads.
Waterfall
Analyze impact of waterfall configurations and segmentation on revenue.
Validate revenue data across MAX and partner networks
Monitor and detect discrepancies between ad sources early to protect your revenue. Compare metrics including:
CPMs
Impressions
Revenue
Understand the entire user lifecycle to optimize LTV
Measure the impact of ad settings on metrics such as user retention, engagement, and revenue per install over time for a group of users who installed an app on the same day.
Get insights into user engagement
View daily analytics on your app’s performance, including number of daily active users in your app, ARPDAU, and the average number of impressions users are seeing. Plus, filter reports by ad format to understand the impact of optimizations.
Access granular data for more accurate ROAS and user LTV calculations
Remove blind spots and better optimize paid user acquisition campaigns with user and impression-level data handed off to your MMP or BI tool of choice.
A/B Testing
Test your entire monetization strategy
Easily set up A/B tests to identify opportunities for driving incremental ad revenue. Test changes to:
Demand partners
Waterfall configurations
Price points
Ad frequency
Refresh rates
User segments
Spend less time on setup and management
Get started quickly and automate processes for revenue optimization
Mediation Management Tools
Modernize traditional waterfalls with automation
Update network CPMs daily without lifting a finger
Ensure fairer competition from non-bidding networks.
Put your CPMs on autopilot
Reduce the need for regular updates, and minimize opportunities for error.
Capture more revenue with better price setting
Leverage historical data to power smart CPM adjustments.
Spend less time on waterfall creation and ad unit management
Manage your setup through the MAX UI or your own BI tool.
Easy Cloning
Speed up waterfall creation by cloning ones that already exist.
Ad Unit Management API
Create ad units, build and update waterfalls, and launch A/B tests via your own platform or BI tool.
Developer Tools
Monetize your apps without disrupting your workflow
Launch your apps confidently
MAX’s testing tools reduce post-launch frustration.
Test Mode
Provide reliable network fill for your test devices.
Mediation Debugger
Verify and troubleshoot your integrated ad networks.
Develop what you want, how you want
MAX provides unmatched support for multiple platforms and development engines.
Supported Platforms
Android
iOS
FireOS
Supported Development Engines
Unity
Adobe AIR
Cordova
React
Unreal
Flutter
Godot
Defold
Unity Integration Manager
Quickly get started monetizing your Unity app with a plugin that integrates the AppLovin SDK and network adapters automatically.
Ensure brand safety
Protect your revenue by ensuring quality in all aspects of your app experience — including which ads users see.
Ad Review
Gain control over ad visibility
Monitor ads running in your app and automatically identify risky or competitive content for easy bad ad reporting.
Detect
Automatically flag risky content and competitor ads based on custom rules and filters.
View
View and filter flagged ads by network, format, content rating, advertiser, rule, and more.
Report
Easily report problematic ads within the dashboard.
Compete
Inform your user acquisition efforts with intel into the latest ad concepts in your app category.
User Journey
Support your support teams — quickly find ads reported by users
View all the ads seen by a user to easily locate problematic ads that could cause churn, and report them directly from the dashboard. Plus, eliminate the need to blindly block ads or networks that may not actually be problematic.
Creative Debugger
Access comprehensive ad information on demand
Use a simple gesture to reveal ad information such as the name of the network, the creative ID, and more, and automatically generate reports for problematic ads.
Here’s what our developers are saying
“
Implementing MAX not only increased our product revenue, but it saved us a lot of operational costs, which allowed our team to refocus their energy on creating great games.
Yudai Hatasa
Producer, KAYAC
“
We are already seeing
incredible lift and increases in revenue
across our top titles, which allows us to invest more in user acquisition.
Dmitry Shelengovskiy
CEO, Playgendary
“
AppLovin made it easy to migrate to MAX and we saw immediate improvements by switching, including a 30% ARPDAU lift on iOS. We were surprised to achieve this much of an improvement without additional optimizations. And even after, the AppLovin team continued to help us with additional tools, integrations, and testing, which drove our total revenue even higher.
Ivan Dama
CEO, IdeaSolutions
“
Implementing MAX not only increased our product revenue, but it saved us a lot of operational costs, which allowed our team to refocus their energy on creating great games.
Yudai Hatasa
Producer, KAYAC
“
We are already seeing
incredible lift and increases in revenue
across our top titles, which allows us to invest more in user acquisition.
Dmitry Shelengovskiy
CEO, Playgendary
“
AppLovin made it easy to migrate to MAX and we saw immediate improvements by switching, including a 30% ARPDAU lift on iOS. We were surprised to achieve this much of an improvement without additional optimizations. And even after, the AppLovin team continued to help us with additional tools, integrations, and testing, which drove our total revenue even higher.
Ivan Dama
CEO, IdeaSolutions
Take your mobile monetization to the MAX
Start earning more
Sub-policy 6
https://gameanalytics.com/privacy:
🔎 Explore our latest A/B testing enhancements.
Read it here
Join User Analysis Beta
Market Research
Analytics
Powerful analytics
How It Works
Quick 4-step setup guide
In-depth Analytics
Make better games with data
Live Ops
Live operations made easy
Integrations
Works with 20+ game engines
Upgrade to Pro
Pro Overview
Explore advanced features
Store Intelligence
Top charts and trending games
Benchmarks
Next-level industry insights
Metrics API
Key metrics from all your games
Data Tools
DataSuite
Do much more with your data
Data Warehouse
Switch on your own data warehouse
Data Export
Your data delivered in JSON format
Resources
Insights & support
Documentation
Detailed technical documentation
Case Studies
Learn how others use GameAnalytics
Feedback
Submit your feature requests
Blog
The #1 game industry blog
Reports & Guides
Our own research and insights
Support
Contact our support team
Pricing
Login
Sign up
Go to tool
Terms & Conditions
EU Data Processing Addendum
China Data Processing Agreement
Developer Policy
Copyright Infringement Reporting
Privacy Notice for Game Developers
Privacy Notice for Job Applicants
China PIPL Privacy Notice
Cookie Policy
Trust Report
SOC 2 Type II
Our ISO/IEC 27001 Certification
KidSAFE COPPA Certified
ePrivacy Seal & OBA Compliance
Legal
Terms & Conditions
EU Data Processing Addendum
China Data Processing Agreement
Developer Policy
Copyright Infringement Reporting
Privacy
Privacy Notice for Game Developers
Privacy Notice for Job Applicants
China PIPL Privacy Notice
Cookie Policy
Security
Trust Report
SOC 2 Type II
Our ISO/IEC 27001 Certification
KidSAFE COPPA Certified
ePrivacy Seal & OBA Compliance
Privacy Notice for Game Developers
Effective Date: 21st August 2023
Version: 2.2
Who we are and what we do
We are GameAnalytics ApS, a company registered in Denmark under company number 34043221, with our registered office at Pilestræde 58, 2, 1112 Copenhagen K, Denmark.
Our affiliate, GameAnalytics Limited is a company registered in England and Wales under registration number 09214168, with their registered office at 18 Soho Square, London, England, W1D 3QL.
GameAnalytics Limited is registered with the UK supervisory authority, Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”) in relation to our processing of Personal Data under registration number ZA439557.
We are an ‘in game’ analytics service provider, working in partnership with developers around the world to monitor and improve everything about their games.
GameAnalytics ApS, together with its affiliate GameAnalytics Limited, (“GameAnalytics”, “we”, “our” or “us”) is committed to protecting the privacy and security of all Personal Data processed as part of its business activities.
Unless we notify you otherwise, we are the controller of the Personal Data we process about you. This means that we decide what Personal Data to collect and how to process it.
The purpose of this privacy notice is to explain what Personal Data we collect about you and how we process it. This privacy notice also explains your rights, so please read it carefully. If you have any questions, you can contact us using the information provided below under the ‘How to contact us’ section.
For residents in Mainland China, please read the GameAnalytics China PIPL Privacy Notice at https://gameanalytics.com/legal/pipl-china.
Who this privacy notice applies to
This privacy notice applies to you if:
You visit our website
You register and/or create a GameAnalytics Account
You enquire about our products and/or services
You purchase goods or services from us
You are an existing client
You contact us by email, telephone or by using our online contact form
You sign up to receive newsletters and/or other promotional communications from us
What Personal Data is
‘‘Personal Data’ means any information from which someone can be identified either directly or indirectly. For example, you can be identified by your name or an online identifier.
‘Special Category Personal Data’ is more sensitive Personal Data and includes information revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, genetic data, biometric data for the purposes of uniquely identifying someone, data concerning physical or mental health or data concerning someone’s sex life or sexual orientation.  Personal Data’ means any information from which someone can be identified either directly or indirectly. For example, you can be identified by your name or an online identifier.
Personal Data we collect
The type of Personal Data we collect about you will depend on our relationship with you. For the type of Personal Data we collect, see the table below in the section entitled ‘Purposes for which we use personal data and the legal bases’.
How we collect your Personal Data
We collect most of the Personal Data directly from you in person, by telephone, text or email and/or via our website.
However, we may also collect your Personal Data from third parties such as:
reputable companies who provide lead generation contact lists
others to whom you have provided consent
publicly available sources such as social media platforms
sub-contractors in technical, payment and delivery services
advertising networks
analytics and tracking software providers and
search information providers
Purposes for which we use personal data and the legal bases
We will only use your Personal Data when the law allows. Most commonly, we will use your Personal Data in the following circumstances
:
Purpose
Lawful Basis for Processing
Responding to correspondence from you
It is in our legitimate interest to respond to enquiries made via our website, by email, through our social channels or any other means.
Sending you information on sales events or product information which may be of interest
If you are an existing customer or have expressed an interest in our products or services, we will rely on legitimate interests to contact you for marketing purposes.
You may object to the processing for this purpose by emailing privacy@gameanalytics.com. If we have captured your consent for the purposes of marketing, that consent may be withdrawn at any time by emailing privacy@gameanalytics.com or using the unsubscribe option.
Provision of our services
Processing is necessary for the performance of the contract between us.
To maintain a record of contact for current client engagement
It is our legitimate interest to maintain a record of the contact we have with you within our client database.
Business management, forecasting and statistical purposes
It is our legitimate interest to identify areas for managing current business relationships, develop new products and services, and for managing our business.
Improving our websites and the overall website visitor and user experience
It is our legitimate interest to allow analytics and search engine providers to help improve and optimise our websites.
Improving our websites and the overall website visitor and user experience.
We use cookies on our websites with your consent.
Improving our platform and the overall client experience.
It is our legitimate interest to utilise analytical and tracking software to help improve and optimise our client platform.
Where Personal Data is processed because it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are a party, we will be unable to provide our services without the required information.
Sharing your Personal Data
We may also disclose your information to third parties in connection with other purposes set out in this privacy notice. These third parties may include:
business partners, suppliers and sub-processors* who may process information on our behalf
advertisers, social media platforms, and advertising networks
analytics and search engine providers
IT service providers
*A list of our sub-processors is available upon request.
This site may include links to third-party websites, plug-ins and applications. Clicking on those links or enabling those connections may allow third parties to collect or share data about you. We do not control these third-party websites and are not responsible for their privacy statements. When you leave our site, we encourage you to read the privacy policy of every website you visit.
Where we are under a legal or regulatory duty to do so, we may disclose your details to the police, regulatory bodies or legal advisors, and/or, where we consider necessary to protect the rights, property or safety of GameAnalytics, its personnel, users or others.
International Transfers
Your Personal Data may be transferred internationally, this is because the organisations we use to provide our service to you are based outside the EU/UK.
We have taken appropriate steps to ensure that any Personal Data being processed internationally, still has an equivalent level of protection to that guaranteed in the EU/UK. We do this by ensuring that:
Your Personal Data is only processed in a country which the Secretary of State has confirmed has an adequate level of protection (an adequacy regulation) or
We either enter into EU Standard Contractual Clauses or an International Data Transfer Agreement (“IDTA”) with the receiving organisation and adopt supplementary measures where necessary. (A copy of the IDTA can be found here international-data-transfer-agreement.pdf (ico.org.uk))
How long we keep your data
We will retain your personal data for as long as is necessary to provide you with our services and for a reasonable period thereafter to enable us to meet our contractual and legal obligations and to deal with complaints and claims.
At the end of the retention period, your personal data will be securely deleted or anonymised, for example by aggregation with other data, so that it can be used in a non-identifiable way for statistical analysis and business planning.
How we protect your data
We implement appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect data against unauthorised or unlawful processing and against accidental loss, destruction or damage.
GameAnalytics is SOC2 Type II** compliant and
ISO27001 certified
. You can review our real-time
Trust Report
and address any inquiries that you may have at
security@gameanalytics.com
.
** The SOC2 Type II Report is available upon request.
In addition to the technical and organisational measures we have put in place, there are simple things you can do to in order to further protect your personal information, such as:
Never share One Time Passcodes (OTPs) or passwords.
Never enter your details after clicking on a link in an email or text message.
Always send confidential information by encrypted email to reduce risk of interception.
If you’re logged into any online service do not leave your computer unattended.
Close down your internet browser once you’ve logged off.
Never download software or let anyone log on to your computer or devices remotely, during or after a cold call.
You can easily identify secure websites by looking at the address in the top of your browser which will begin https:// rather than http://.
Your data protection rights
GameAnalytics would like to make sure you are fully aware of your rights. We will always ensure, no matter where you are located in the world, that we adhere to and fully respect your data protection rights.
You have the following rights if you are located in the EU or UK:
Rights
Description
Right to be informed
Individuals have the right to be informed about the collection and use of their personal data.
Right of access
Individuals have the right to receive a copy of their personal data, and other supplementary information.
Right to rectification
Individuals have the right to have inaccurate personal data rectified or completed if it is incomplete.
Right to erasure (the ‘right to be forgotten’)
Individuals have the right to request their personal information to be erased, in certain circumstances.
Right to restrict processing
Individuals have the right to request the restriction or suppression of their personal data, in certain circumstances, in particular:
if your data is not accurate;
if your data has been used unlawfully but you do not want us to delete it;
if your data is no longer needed, but you want us to keep it for use in legal claims; or
if you have already asked us to stop using your data but you are waiting to receive confirmation from us as to whether we can comply with your request.
Right to data portability
Individuals have the right to obtain and reuse their personal data, in a machine-readable format, for their own purposes across different services, in certain circumstances.
Right to object
Individuals have the right to object to the processing of their personal data, in certain circumstances.
Where we are using your personal data because it is in our legitimate interests to do so, you can object to us using it this way.
Where we are using your personal data for direct marketing, including profiling for direct marketing purposes, you have an absolute right to ask us to stop doing so.
Rights with respect to automated decision-making and profiling
Individuals have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing (including profiling) that produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affects you.
In addition to the above, an individual also has the following rights:
Rights
Description
Right to withdraw consent
(if applicable)
Where we are using your personal data based on your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time.
Right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority
Our lead EU data protection supervisory authority is the Danish Datatilsynet and you can submit a complaint via this
link
(local language).
You can also submit a complaint directly to the Information Commissioner’s Office (the ICO), the UK supervisory authority for data protection in the UK, via this
link
.
If you are based anywhere within the EEA a list of supervisory authorities can be found via this
link
.
If you are based in Switzerland, you can contact the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner via this
link
(local language).
Exercising your data protection rights
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal data (or to exercise any of the other rights). However, we may charge a reasonable fee if your request for access is clearly unfounded or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with the request in such circumstances.
If you wish to exercise your data protection rights, please email
privacy@gameanalytics.com
.
Recruitment
We may advertise job vacancies and opportunities on the careers section of our website, for more information on how we process candidate information please read our recruitment privacy notice.
Children’s Privacy
GameAnalytics is committed to complying with the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) and protecting the online privacy of children under the age of 13. Our services are not directed at children under 13, and we do not knowingly collect personal information, including persistent identifiers, from such individuals without verifiable parental consent.
As required by COPPA, our privacy policy clearly states that we do not share personal information or persistent identifiers related to children with third parties.
If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your child has provided us with their Personal Data without your consent, please contact us via email at
privacy@gameanalytics.com
or via phone at +45 20110132.
By using our Services, you acknowledge that you have read and understood our commitment to COPPA compliance and our practices regarding the collection and use of personal information from children.
Cookies
A cookie is a text file containing small amounts of information which are downloaded to your computer or mobile device when you visit a website. Cookies do lots of different jobs, such as letting you navigate between pages efficiently, remembering your preferences, and providing you with content that is relevant to you.
We use cookies on our website, more information about which can be found within our
Cookie Policy
.
How to contact us
If you would like to exercise your statutory data protection rights, or if you have any concerns or questions about how we handle personal data, please contact us using the details below.
Danish office:
GameAnalytics ApS
Pilestræde 58, 2,
1112 Copenhagen K,
Denmark
Email: dkoffice@gameanalytics.com
UK office:
GameAnalytics Limited
18 Soho Square,
London,
W1D 3QL
Email: ukoffice@gameanalytics.com.
Please send your communication clearly indicating ‘F.A.O. Data Protection Officer’ and your message will be passed directly to the DPO for attention.
How To Complain
You have the right to lodge a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority if you are concerned about the way in which we are handling your Personal Data.
Our lead EU data protection supervisory authority is the Danish Datatilsynet and you can contact them and/or submit a complaint via this
link
(local language).
You can also submit a complaint directly to the Information Commissioner’s Office (the ICO), the UK supervisory authority for data protection in the UK, via this
link.
If you are based anywhere within the EEA a list of supervisory authorities can be found via this
link
.
If you are based in Switzerland, you can contact the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner via this
link
(local language).
Changes to this privacy notice
We may update this notice (and any supplemental privacy notice), from time to time as shown below. We will notify you of the changes where required by applicable law to do so.
×
Subscribe
×
activity-line
android
apple
ball
browser
btn-arrow-down
btn-arrow-down
c++
c#
caps-arrow
caution
close
comment
down-arrow
external
handheld
house
icon-next
icon-prev
ios
js
listen
macos
meta
mobile-menu
palette
play
read
satellite
search
social-facebook
social-instagram
social-linkedin
social-twitter
sofa
square
team
tiles
unity
unreal
up-arrow
user
windows
winner
yay
×
Our website uses cookies
GameAnalytics would like to use our own and 10 selected third party cookies or similar technologies for necessary, analytical, and marketing purposes. You can set your preferences by selecting the options below, and withdraw your consent anytime via the shield icon.
Necessary
Functionality
Experience
Measurement
Marketing
Press again to continue 0/1
Learn more
Reject all
Accept all